Tennessee statutes. Title 32 Wills
Chapter 5

Administration Upon Foreign Wills

32-5-101. Recording will.

A will, duly proved, allowed and admitted to probate outside of this state, may be allowed and recorded in the proper court of any county in this state, in which the testator has left any estate.

Acts 1919, ch. 77, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3924a11; Code 1932, § 8113; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-501.

Cross-References. Contest of wills, title 32, ch. 4.

Eligible for registration, §66-24-101.

Fees of clerks of courts administering probate matters, §§8-21-401,8-21-701,8-21-702.

Jurisdiction of chancery courts of probate and related matters, title 16, ch. 16, part 2.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 53, 54, 1037.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Conflict of Laws, Domicile and Residence, §§ 26, 27; 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 57.

Law Reviews.

Conflict of Laws — 1955 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 964 (1955).

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

32-5-102. Executors of other states qualifying — Bond.

When there are goods and chattels in this state to be administered under a will of another state, district or territory, the executors, or some one of them, may qualify as executors, and they shall give bond, with surety, as required in cases where the will was made within the limits of this state, and they shall be subject to be proceeded against as in other cases.

Code 1858, § 2189 (deriv. Acts 1823, ch. 31, § 3); Shan., § 3921; Code 1932, § 8122; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-510.

Cross-References. Address given clerk for service of process, service of process upon clerk after qualification, §30-1-104.

Administration upon estates of nonresident decedents, §30-1-103.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 58, 60, 62.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

32-5-103. Petition for probate — Hearing — Notice.

When a copy of a will of another state, district, or territory and the probate of the will, duly authenticated, is presented by the executor or by any other person interested in the will, with a petition for probate of the will, the will must be filed and probate may be had either in common or in solemn form, and if the latter, then a time must be appointed for a hearing and notice must be given as is required by law on a petition for the original probate of a domestic will in solemn form; provided, however, that a contest of a will of another state, district, or territory upon the issue devisavit vel non shall be allowed as to a devise of realty lying in this state, but as to devises of personalty, the foreign probate of such will shall be conclusive.

Acts 1919, ch. 77, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 3924a12; Code 1932, § 8114; Acts 1941, ch. 63, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8114; Acts 1959, ch. 112, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-502.

Cross-References. Contest of wills, title 32, ch. 4.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 54, 56.

Law Reviews.

Conflict of Laws — 1959 Tennessee Survey (John W. Wade), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1090 (1959).

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

32-5-104. Admitting will to probate.

If upon the hearing, it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the will has been duly proved, allowed and admitted to probate outside of the state, and that it was executed according to the law of the place in which the will was made, or in which the testator was at the time domiciled, or in conformity with the laws of this state, it must be admitted to probate, which probate shall have the same force and effect as the original probate of a domestic will.

Acts 1919, ch. 77, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 3924a13; Code 1932, § 8115; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-503.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 54.

Law Reviews.

Conflict of Laws — 1964 Tennessee Survey (Elliott E. Cheatham), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1093 (1965).

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

32-5-105. Unprobated will from state or country not requiring probate.

When a duly authenticated copy of a will from any state or country, where probate is not required by the laws of that state or country, with a duly authenticated certificate of the legal custodian of the original will that the copy is a true copy, and that the will has become operative by the laws of that state or country, and when a copy of a notarial will in possession of a notary in a foreign state or country entitled to the custody of the will, the laws of which state or country require that the will remain in the custody of the notary, duly authenticated by the notary, is presented by the executor or other persons interested to the proper court in this state, that court shall appoint a time and place of hearing and notice of the hearing shall be given as in case of an original will presented for probate.

If it appears to the court that the instrument ought to be allowed in this state, as the last will and testament of the deceased, the copy shall be filed and recorded, and the will shall have the same effect as if originally proved and allowed in the court.

Acts 1919, ch. 77, § 4; Shan. Supp., §§ 3924a14, 3924a15; Code 1932, §§ 8116, 8117; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 32-504, 32-505.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 53, 54.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

32-5-106. Contest.

Any person interested to contest the validity of a will of another country, state, district, or territory as to realty may do so in the same manner and time limit as though it had been originally presented for probate in that court.

Code 1858, § 2190 (deriv. Acts 1823, ch. 31, § 3); Shan., § 3922; mod. Code 1932, § 8118; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-506.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 54.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Wills, § 80.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

32-5-107. Authentication.

Any copy of a will from another state, District of Columbia or territory shall be authenticated in the manner prescribed by 28 U.S.C. §§ 1738 and 1739.

Code 1858, § 2186 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 187, § 1); Shan., § 3918; mod. Code 1932, § 8119; modified; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 565, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-507.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 54, 1037.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

32-5-108. Copy of will as evidence.

A copy of a will from another state, District of Columbia or territory, as recorded, certified by the clerk of the court in this state where copy is recorded, shall be evidence.

Code 1858, § 2188 (deriv. Acts 1823, ch. 31, § 2; 1843-1844, ch. 187, § 1); Shan., § 3920; mod. Code 1932, § 8120; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-508.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 54.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

32-5-109. Registration of will as muniment of title.

A copy of a will, foreign or domestic, certified by the clerk, may be registered in the county where the land lies as a muniment of title, and a copy from the books of the register, duly certified by the register, shall be evidence.

Code 1858, § 2183 (deriv. Acts 1823, ch. 31, § 2); Shan., § 3915; mod. Code 1932, § 8121; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 32-509.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 54.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

32-5-110. Foreign unprobated wills.

Where a foreign will has not been probated in another jurisdiction, any person interested may apply for its probate before the probate court of the county in this state in which the real estate or any part of the real estate is located.

To that end the interested person shall present a petition to the probate court, setting forth the death of the foreign testator, the decedent's ownership of lands in the county, and the fact of the decedent's testacy, whereupon the court shall authorize the taking of such proof as may be necessary to prove the will in accordance with the laws of this state.

Depositions may be taken either upon interrogatories filed in the court for ten (10) days, or by oral examination at a time and place designated by the court.

No notice shall be required of the taking of the depositions, save any resulting from the making of the order for the depositions by the court.

When the depositions are taken by oral examination, the time that elapses between the making of the order for the depositions and the taking of the depositions shall not be less than the time prescribed for notice for taking depositions under the general laws.

Should it not be possible to exhibit to the depositions and produce before the probate court the original will, a copy of the will may be so used, the necessary witnesses proving that it is a true copy of the original.

On being admitted to probate, the probate shall have the same force and effect as to real estate as the probate in this state of wills of residents of this state have as to lands devised by them, but nothing in this section is to prevent the proving of foreign wills as at common law and without probate.

The will shall, as to real estate, be to the same extent and in the same manner as domestic wills subject to contest in the state, and certified copies of the record in the probate court shall be available as evidence as are copies of domestic wills and probate of domestic wills; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall apply to wills dated more than fifty-five (55) years prior to the enactment of this Code.

Acts 1909, ch. 87, §§ 3, 4; Shan., §§ 3924a5-3924a10; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8123 — 8128; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 32-511 — 32-516.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 53, 54.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Probate Courts, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 461 (1978).

Chapters 6-10

[Reserved]